Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1748
Reference to compliance with act; prohibited.

No seller shall make or authorize the making of any reference to its compliance with the Seller-Assisted Marketing Plan Act.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 48;

Laws 1993, LB 218, § 17.